test/src/morphology/N-oksaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - oksā: # Noun 30 'eng /est oks/fin' - full paradigm
     oksā+N+Sg+Nom: oksā
     oksā+N+Sg+Gen: oksā
     oksā+N+Sg+Par: oksõ
     oksā+N+Sg+Dat: oksān
     oksā+N+Sg+Ins: oksāks
     oksā+N+Sg+Ill: oksõ
     oksā+N+Sg+Ela: oksāst
     oksā+N+Pl+Nom: oksād
     oksā+N+Pl+Gen: oksād
     oksā+N+Pl+Par: okšti
     oksā+N+Pl+Dat: oksādõn
     oksā+N+Pl+Ins: oksādõks
     oksā+N+Pl+Ill: oksīž
     oksā+N+Pl+Ela: oksīst
